Massachusetts, session 194th, H3789.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7C of chapter 89 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is amended by inserting after the definition of “Recovery vehicle” the following
2 definitions:-
"Utility vehicle," a vehicle being used to install, maintain, repair, operate or restore
communications service, electric or gas distribution or transmission service in an emergency and
that is operated by an employee of or a person under contract with a company incorporated for
the transmission of intelligence by electricity or by telephone or an electric distribution,
transmission or distribution company as defined by section 1 of chapter 164.
“Disabled vehicle”, a motor vehicle that has been abandoned or rendered inoperable by
mechanical failure or accident.
of 2

SECTION 2. Subsection (b) of said section 7C of said chapter 89, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the words “maintenance vehicle”, the following words:- “,
utility vehicle or disabled vehicle”.
SECTION 3. Paragraph (1) of said subsection (b) of said section 7C of said chapter 89, as
so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “maintenance vehicle”, the
following words:- “, utility vehicle or disabled vehicle”.
of 2